Hawaii statutes.
§171-80 Cancellation of leases.
Whenever the board of land and natural resources has reason to believe that any
term or condition of a residential lease has been violated, it shall give
notice to the lessee of the suspected violation as provided in section 171-20,
and shall afford the lessee an opportunity to be heard. If upon the hearing,
the board finds that the lessee has violated the terms and conditions of the
lease, it may declare the lessee's interest in the lease and improvements
forfeited and order the premises to be vacated within a reasonable time. No
such forfeiture shall, however, operate to forfeit the interest of any
mortgagee in the lease and improvements, and the board shall pay from the
special land and development fund the amount due upon and secured by the
mortgage; provided that payment need not be made if a new lease of the premises
and improvements is made to a new lessee who is willing to assume, and if the
mortgagee is willing to accept the new lessee's assumption of, the mortgage and
the debt secured thereby. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-76; HRS §171-80]

Cross References

Administrative hearing, see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next